Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 26.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-29,110
Authority to amend articles of organization or bylaws; rights of member.

(1) A limited cooperative association may amend its articles of organization or bylaws.

(2) Unless the articles of organization or bylaws provide otherwise, a member of a limited cooperative association does not have vested property rights resulting from any provision in the articles of organization or bylaws, including provisions relating to management, control, capital structure, distribution, entitlement, purpose, or duration of the limited cooperative association.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 110;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 26.